Hawaii statutes.
§103D-702 Authority to debar or suspend.
(a) After reasonable notice to the person involved and reasonable opportunity
for that person to be heard, the chief procurement officer, after consultation
with the using agency and the attorney general or corporation counsel, may
debar a person for cause from consideration for award of all public contracts
and from performance on any public contract. The serious nature of debarment
and suspension requires that these sanctions be imposed only in the public interest
for a governmental body's protection and not for the purpose of punishment. An
agency shall impose debarment or suspension to protect a governmental body's
interests and only for cause and in accordance with this section. The
debarment period shall not exceed three years. The same officer, after
consultation with the using agency and the attorney general or corporation
counsel, may suspend a person from consideration for award of all public
contracts and from performance on any public contract if there is probable
cause for debarment. The suspension period shall not exceed three months. The
authority to debar or suspend shall be exercised in accordance with the
procedures prescribed by rules adopted by the policy board and shall be applied
only to causes, convictions, and violations under subsection (b) after the
effective date of the rules adopted by the policy board.

(b) The causes for debarment or suspension
include the following:

(1) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense
as an incident to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private
contract or subcontract, or in the performance of the contract or subcontract;

(2) Conviction under state or federal statutes
relating to embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction
of records, receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicating a lack
of business integrity or business honesty which currently, seriously, and
directly affects responsibility as a contractor;

(3) Conviction under state or federal antitrust
statutes arising out of the submission of bids or proposals;

(4) Violation of contract provisions, as set forth
below, of a character that is regarded by the chief procurement officer to be
so serious as to justify debarment action:

(A) Deliberate failure without good cause to
perform in accordance with the specifications or within the time limit provided
in the contract; or

(B) A recent record of failure to perform or
of unsatisfactory performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts;
provided that failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by acts
beyond the control of the contractor shall not be considered to be a basis for
debarment;

(5) Any other cause the chief procurement officer
determines to be so serious and compelling as to affect responsibility as a
contractor, including debarment by another governmental entity for any cause
listed in the rules of the policy board; and

(6) Violation of the ethical standards set forth in
chapter 84 and its implementing rules, or the charters and ordinances of the
several counties and their implementing rules.

(c) The existence of a cause for debarment
does not necessarily require that a contractor be debarred. The seriousness of
a contractor's acts or omissions and any remedial measure or mitigating factors
shall be considered in making any debarment decision. Before arriving at any
debarment decision, the chief procurement officer shall consider factors such
as the following:

(1) Whether the contractor had effective standards of
conduct and internal control systems in place at the time of the activity
constituting cause for debarment or had adopted those procedures prior to any
government investigation of the activity cited as the cause for debarment;

(2) Whether the contractor brought the activity cited
as the cause for debarment to the attention of the appropriate government
agency in a timely manner;

(3) Whether the contractor fully investigated the
circumstances surrounding the cause for debarment and made the result of the
investigation available to the chief procurement officer;

(4) Whether the contractor cooperated fully with
government agencies during the investigation and any court or administrative
action;

(5) Whether the contractor has paid or has agreed to
pay all criminal, civil, and administrative liability for improper activity,
including any investigative or administrative costs incurred by the
governmental body, and has made or has agreed to make full restitution;

(6) Whether the contractor has taken appropriate
disciplinary action against the individuals responsible for the activity
constituting the cause for debarment;

(7) Whether the contractor has implemented or agreed
to implement remedial measures, including any identified by the governmental body
or the chief procurement officer;

(8) Whether the contractor has instituted or agreed
to institute new or revised review and control procedures and ethics training
programs;

(9) Whether the contractor has had adequate time to
eliminate the circumstances within the contractor's organization that led to
the cause for debarment; and

(10) Whether the contractor's management recognizes
and understands the seriousness of the misconduct giving rise to the cause for
debarment and has implemented programs to prevent its recurrence.

The existence or nonexistence of any mitigating
factors or remedial measures such as those set forth in this subsection shall
not necessarily be determinative of a contractor's present responsibility. If
a cause for debarment exists, the contractor has the burden of demonstrating to
the satisfaction of the chief procurement officer the contractor's present
responsibility and that debarment is not necessary.

(d) The chief procurement officer shall issue
a written decision to debar or suspend. The decision shall:

(1) State the reasons for the action taken; and

(2) Inform the debarred or suspended person involved
of the person's rights to review as provided in this part.

(e) A copy of the decision under subsection
(d) shall be mailed or otherwise furnished immediately to the debarred or
suspended person and any other party intervening.

(f) The chief procurement officer shall
transmit a copy of the decision to debar or suspend a contractor to the state
procurement office, which shall distribute a list to all governmental bodies
containing the names of persons or firms debarred or suspended from
consideration for award of all public contracts and from performance on any
public contract.

(g) Upon written notification under subsection
(f), the chief procurement officer shall make a written determination whether
to allow the debarred or suspended person or firm to continue performance on
any contract awarded prior to the effective date of the debarment or
suspension.

(h) A decision under subsection (d) shall be
final and conclusive, unless the debarred or suspended person commences an
administrative proceeding under section 103D-709. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am
L 1997, c 352, §23; am L 1999, c 162, §2; am L 2004, c 216, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next